Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.320

ESD superintendents, employees—Travel expenses and subsistence—Advance payment.

For all actual and necessary travel in the performance of official duties and while in attendance upon meetings and conferences, each educational service district superintendent and employee shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in the amounts provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended. All claims shall be approved by the educational service district board and paid from the funds budgeted by the district. Each educational service district superintendent and employee may be advanced sufficient sums to cover their anticipated expenses in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state auditor and which shall substantially conform to the procedures provided in RCW 43.03.150 through 43.03.210.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 69; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 29; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 19; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 13. Formerly RCW 28A.21.130, 28.19.560.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.